North Dakota, session 69, HB1006.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from federal funds, to the tax commissioner for
the purpose of defraying the expenses of the tax commissioner and paying the state reimbursement
under the homestead tax credit, disabled veterans' tax credit, and primary residence credit, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $24,036,152 $2,111,868 $26,148,020
New and vacant FTE pool 0 1,119,992 1,119,992
Operating expenses 8,613,370 1,824,741 10,438,111
Capital assets 6,000 0 6,000
Homestead tax credit 72,400,000 (11,800,000) 60,600,000
Disabled veterans' tax credit 18,745,000 10,655,000 29,400,000
Primary residence credit 103,225,000 (103,225,000) 0
Total all funds $227,025,522 ($99,313,399) $127,712,123
Less other funds 125,000 0 125,000
Total general fund $226,900,522 ($99,313,399) $127,587,123
Full-time equivalent positions 117.00 0.00 117.00
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total
Property tax relief administration $1,000,000 $0 $1,000,000
Total $1,000,000 $0 $1,000,000
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The tax
commissioner may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item in section 1
of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the new and
vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in accordance with the guidelines and
reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth legislative
assembly.
SECTION 4. EXEMPTION - LINE ITEM TRANSFERS. Notwithstanding section 54-16-04, the state
tax commissioner may transfer funds between the homestead tax credit and disabled veterans' tax
credit line items in section 1 of this Act if one line item does not have sufficient funds available for state

H. B. NO. 1006 - PAGE 2
reimbursement of eligible tax credits. The state tax commissioner shall notify the office of management
and budget and the legislative council of any transfers made pursuant to this section.
SECTION 5. MOTOR VEHICLE FUEL TAX REVENUE TRANSFER. There is transferred to the
general fund in the state treasury out of motor vehicle tax revenue collected pursuant to section
57-43.1-02, the sum of $1,761,168, for the purpose of reimbursing the general fund for expenses
incurred in the collection of the motor vehicle fuels and special fuels taxes and the administration of
these taxes, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 57-01-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
57-01-04. Salary.
The annual salary of the state tax commissioner is one hundred thirty-one thousand seven hundred
five one hundred forty - one thousand eighty - two dollars through June 30, 20242026, and one hundred
thirty-six thousand nine hundred seventy-three one hundred forty - five thousand three hundred fourteen
dollars thereafter.

H. B. NO. 1006 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1006.
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 3 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State